Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-272
Aggrieved person, defined.

Aggrieved person means a person who was a party to any intercepted wire, electronic, or oral communication or a person against whom the interception was directed.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 134.